









Architecting the Modern Software Factory - CA Technologies
















































{{item.title}}



                        North America (English)
                    

{{account.inactiveText}}

{{account.activeText}}


                    {{search ? 'Close':'Search'}}
                
































{{item.title}}





{{section.promo.title}}
{{section.promo.description}}
{{section.promo.cta}}








{{section.promo.title}}
{{section.promo.description}}
{{section.promo.cta}}










                        North America (English)




{{account.inactiveText}}

                        {{account.activeText}}








{{item.title}}




                  {{search ? 'Close':'Search'}}
            



















Solutions
                        





Products
                        





Resources
                        






{{ solutionResults.length + productResults.length +
                            resourceResults.length > 0 ? 'See all Search Results' :
                            'Full site search'}} >






















                Welcome to the Modern Software FactoryTake the Tour






                Welcome to the Modern Software FactoryTake the Tour

























Back to ca.com >



Tell us what you need to do, and we’ll help you get there.




                    Create an agile business
                  




                    Build better apps, faster
                  




                    Maximize app performance
                  




                    Make security a competitive advantage
                  



















CA makes software that helps businesses compete.


















Build better apps faster
A complete solution set to help you deliver amazing quality, amazingly quick.



Here's how:

Automate App Development, Testing and Release













                        Automate Software Development
                      

                        Build better apps with less risk and more speed, with CA Technologies.
                      






PRODUCTS

CA Agile Requirements Designer

Build test cases as user stories are created. Create the test cases for all scenarios.
Free Trial
Learn More


CA Agile Central >
CA Test Data Manager >
BlazeMeter >
CA Continuous Delivery Director >
CA Release Automation >




Continuous Testing













                        Continuous Testing
                      

                        Deliver more customer value, faster than ever, with continuous testing solutions from CA.
                      






PRODUCTS

CA Test Data Manager

Fully test app performance with subsets of production data or create synthetic data on demand.
Learn More


BlazeMeter >
CA Agile Requirements Designer >
CA Service Virtualization >
CA Continuous Delivery Director >










Create an agile business
Agile is the future. And the future is now. Find all you need to be agile here.



Here's how:

Modernize App Architectures













                        Modernize App Architectures
                      

                        Unlock the value of your data at every step, with API Management.
                      






PRODUCTS

API Management

Create flexible architectures with microservices and manage, integrate and secure your APIs at scale.
Free Trial
Learn More






Plan, Prioritize and Track













                        Plan, Prioritize and Track
                      

                        Synchronize your teams and cut time to market with CA Agile Central.
                      






PRODUCTS

CA Agile Central

Plan, prioritize and track your work and keep your teams in sync. Align your projects to key business initiatives.
Learn More


CA Project & Portfolio Management >










Maximize application performance
Great businesses are built on great apps. Get all you need to make both the best.



Here's how:

Monitor API Performance













                        Maximize App Performance
                      

                        Get real insight you can act on, with CA Application Performance Management.
                      






PRODUCTS

CA Application Performance Management

Monitor modern application environments from mobile to mainframe.
Free Trial
Learn More


API Management >




Deliver Five-Star Experiences













                        Deliver Five-Star Experiences
                      

                        Deliver a flawless digital experience with analytics-driven insights.
                      






PRODUCTS

Digital Experience Insights
Deliver a flawless digital experience with analytics-driven insights.
Free Trial
Learn More






Proactively Prevent Problems













                        Proactively Prevent Problems
                      

                        Assure application performance from mobile to mainframe.
                      






PRODUCTS

Mainframe Operational Intelligence
Get operational insight from mobile to mainframe.
Learn More


CA Application Performance Management >










Make security a competitive advantage
Keep your data safe—without frustrating your users. With solutions for every app, infrastructure and workload.



Here's how:

Secure Apps, Infrastructure and Data













                        Secure Your Apps, Infrastructure and Data
                      

                        Keep your data safe and your customer experiences seamless, with security solutions from CA.
                      






PRODUCTS

CA Privileged Access Manager

Continually monitor privileged user accounts, assess risk and spot malicious activity.
Learn More


Identity Management >
CA Threat Analytics for PAM >




Protect Data Privacy













                        Protect Data Privacy
                      

                        Your data is your business. Protect it with CA Test Data Manager.
                      






PRODUCTS

CA Test Data Manager

Prevent personal data from proliferating across your systems—in both testing and preproduction environments.
Learn More


CA Privileged Access Manager >
CA Data Content Discovery >
CA Project & Portfolio Management >








Previous
Next























Modern Software Factory Hub: What you need to power your digital transformation.
Find the tips, tools and insights for your business.






                
                    Get insights >
                
            

















CA World ’17: Your goals. Made real.
We’ll help you remove the barriers between your ideas and business outcomes.






                
                    Register now >
                
            

















CA and Eurosport give cycling fans more to cheer about.
CA API Management and CA App Experience Analytics fuel a first-of-its-kind viewing experience.






                
                    See how >
                
            























 Enterprise scale at startup speed. 





“Kick the tires” on the whole portfolio.








 

Plan
From a team of ten to a global workforce, we take your whole company agile.
Explore >









 

Build
The software you need to put APIs at the center of your development.
Explore >









 

Test
Stability with certainty. We’ll make sure your latest release is ready to scale.
Explore >













 

Release
It’s a 24/7 world. Automate your release efforts to keep up with customer expectations.
Explore >









 

Operate
Insights to know what your customers like; monitoring to ensure they love the experience.
Explore >









 

Secure
Solutions to check the box on safety while blowing the doors off the customer experience.
Explore >







































 CA+ Video Learning 





Hosted by leading industry experts, this comprehensive video library contains proven, practical advice to help you create and capture significant business opportunities.






                
                    See Videos
                
            


















Every industry is unique.
But today they all have one thing in common—they’re all in the software business. We understand your individual challenges and can craft solutions to meet your specific needs.






                
                    View industry case studies >
                
            












We make the best companies better.
We’ve helped organizations around the world transform their business and create lasting value.






                
                    View customer success stories >
                
            

















 An up-to-date look at the latest tools, trends and technologies. 











PRESS RELEASE
        
Automic Announces Continuous Delivery for SAP Environments
        

            Read more >
        














PRESS RELEASE
        
CA Technologies Reports First Quarter Fiscal Year 2018 Results
        

            Read more >
        














CORPORATE NEWS
        
Continuous Testing and Open Source Integration: An Interview with Alex Martins
        

            Read more >
        














                
                    See All News
                
            



















                        {{link.title}}
                    















                            {{link.title}}
                        




Copyright © 2017 CA. All
                    rights reserved.











Chat


What would you like to chat about?
Support

Product, Sales, or General Inquiries
Product, Sales, or General Inquiries

Product, Sales, or General Inquiries







Contact




Call us at 1-800-225-5224


Call us at 1-800-225-5224
                    
Contact Us







Email


Get in touch with CA
Email Us









Chat with CA






Just give us some brief information and we'll connect you to the right CA ExpertCA sales representative.
Our hours of availability are 8AM - 5PM CST.

All Fields Required

First Name
                    


Last Name
                    


Email Address


How can we help you?
            




We're matching your request.



Unfortunately, we can't connect you to an agent. If you are not automatically redirected please click here.




{{message.agentProfile.name}} will be helping you today.
View Profile









Transfered to {{message.agentProfile.name}}
{{message.agentProfile.name}} joined the
                    conversation
{{message.agentProfile.name}} left the conversation




Your chat with {{$storage.chatSession.messages[$index - 1].agentProfile.name}} has
                    ended.
                    Thank you for your interest in CA.


 Rate Your Chat Experience. 
{{chat.statusMsg}}






agent is typing






Request Chat



Cancel
                    Chat



Send
End Chat



Close Chat














Coca-Cola Amatil Careers | Home
























Skip to content
















CURRENT JOBS


MY CCA


CCA























Careers


Our Benefits


Our Leadership


Our Recruitment Process




Functions


Customer & Consumer


Production & Distribution


Sales Support Functions




Contracting 


Contact


Graduates







CURRENT JOBS


MY CCA


CCA















Home















Coca-Cola Amatil operates in six countries - Australia, New Zealand, Indonesia, Papua New Guinea, Fiji and Samoa.
As one of the largest manufacturers and distributors of ready-to-drink alcohol and non-alcohol beverages, coffee and ready to eat food snacks in the Asia-Pacific region, we are proud of our products which millions of people make part of their lives, ever day.We directly employ around 14,000 people and indirectly create thousands more jobs across the supply chain. Partnering with key suppliers we manufacture, package, sell and distribute products loved by so many.


















                        Who we are 
                    


                        We are one of the largest bottlers and distributors of non-alcoholic and alcoholic ready-to-drink beverages in the Asia Pacific
                    


Learn More 
















                        Graduate Program
                    


                        The Graduate Program is a two-year structured program focused on building leaders of the future. 
                    


Learn More 
















                        Browse Vacancies
                    


                        Browse all current job vacancies
                    


Learn How 



































National Income and Product Accounts - Wikipedia





















 






National Income and Product Accounts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For a broader coverage, including national account systems used outside of the U.S., see National accounts
The national income and product accounts (NIPA) are part of the national accounts of the United States. They are produced by the Bureau of Economic Analysis of the Department of Commerce. They are one of the main sources of data on general economic activity in the United States.
They use double-entry accounting to report the monetary value and sources of output produced in the country and the distribution of incomes that production generates. Data are available at the national and industry levels.
Seven summary accounts are published, as well as a much larger number of more specific accounts. The first summary account shows gross domestic product (GDP) and its major components. The table summarizes national income on the left (debit, revenue) side and national product on the right (credit, expense) side of a two-column accounting report. Thus the left side gives GDP by the income method, and the right side gives GDP by the expenditure method. The GDP is given on the bottom line of both sides of the report. GDP must have the same value on both sides of the account. This is because income and expenditure are defined in a way that forces them to be equal (see accounting identity). We show the 2003 table later in this article; we present the left side first for convenient screen display.
The U.S. report (updated quarterly) is available in several forms, including interactive, from links on the Bureau of Economic Analysis (BEA) NIPA ([1]) page. Other countries report based on their own adopted system of National accounts which are frequently based on the U.S. NIPAs, the widely adopted United Nations System of National Accounts, or their own custom approach. The level of detail (granularity) accounted for internally, and reported publicly, varies widely across countries. Likewise, a nation's system of accounts, (analogous to a firm's Chart of accounts) are typically gradually revised and updated on their own individual schedule. The U.S. NIPAs are prepared by the staff of the Directorate for National Economic Accounts within the BEA. The source data largely originate from public sources, such as government surveys and administrative data, and they are supplemented by data from private sources, such as data from trade associations (BEA 2008: 1–6).



Contents


1 Income accounting
2 Production accounting
3 See also
4 Notes
5 References
6 External links



Income accounting[edit]
The income side of the national income and product account report begins with the kinds of income people might have. Employee compensation includes the wages and salaries paid to anyone whose income is subject to income tax withholding. Since wages and salaries affect more individuals and families directly than the other sources of income, it has by far the largest value.


National income accounts of the U.S., 2003[note 1]


Billions of current US$


Employee compensation [note 2]
6,289.00


Proprietors' income with IVA and CCA [note 3]
834.10


Rental income of persons with CCA
153.80


Corporate profits with IVA and CCA [note 4]
1,021.10


Net interest and miscellaneous payments
543.00


Taxes on production and imports
798.10


Less: subsidies
−46.70


Business current transfer payments (net)
77.70


Current surplus of government enterprises
9.50


Equals: national income (NI)
9,679.60


Statistical discrepancy
25.60


Equals: net national product (NNP)
9,705.20


Consumption of fixed capital
1,353.90


Equals: gross national product (GNP)
11,059.10


Income receipts from the rest of the world
273.90


Less: Income payments to the rest of the world
−329.00


Equals: gross domestic product (GDP) [note 5]
11,004.00


Proprietors' income is the payments to those who own non-corporate businesses, including sole proprietors and partners. inventory value adjustment (IVA) and capital consumption adjustment (CCA) are corrections for changes in the value of proprietor's inventory (goods that may be sold within one year) and capital (goods like machines and buildings that are not expected to be sold within one year) under rules set by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS).
Rental income of persons excludes rent paid to corporate real estate companies. Real estate is capital rather than inventory by definition, so there is no IVA.
Corporate profits with IVA and CCA is like the entries for proprietors' income and rental income except that the organization is a corporation. Corporate profit is shown before taxes, which are part of taxes on production and imports, two lines down.
Business current transfer payments is not explained here.
Net interest and miscellaneous payments is interest paid minus interest received plus payments to individuals and corporations that are not elsewhere classified (NEC). Taxes on production and imports does not include corporate income tax payments to the states and to the federal government. Taxes on production and imports were previously classified as "indirect business taxes" and include excise taxes, sales taxes, property taxes, and other taxes relating to business production. While the report includes the net value of interest payments and receipts, both the taxes paid and subsidies from the government are shown.
National income (NI) is the sum of employees, proprietors, rental, corporate, interest, and government income less the subsidies government pays to any of those groups.
Net national product (NNP) is National Income plus or minus the statistical discrepancy that accumulates when aggregating data from millions of individual reports. In this case, the statistical discrepancy is US$25.6 billion, or about 0.23% of gross domestic product. A discrepancy that small (less than three-tenths of one percent) is immaterial under accounting standards.
Gross national product is net national product plus an allowance for the consumption of fixed capital, mostly buildings and machines, usually called depreciation. Capital is used up in production but it does not vanish.
Finally, GDP is gross national product plus payments from the rest of the world that are income to residents of the U.S. minus payments from the US to the rest of the world that count as income where they are received.
Production accounting[edit]
Macroeconomics defines GDP, from the production perspective, as the sum of personal consumption, investment, net exports, and government expenditures; GDP = C + I + (X − M) + G.


National product accounts of the U.S., 2003[note 1]


Billions of current US$


Durable goods
950.70
 


Nondurable goods
2,200.10
 


Services
4,610.10
 


Personal consumption expenditures
 
7,760.90


Nonresidential
1,094.70
 


Residential
572.30
 


Change in private inventories
−1.20
 


Gross private domestic investment
 
1,665.80


Exports
1,046.20
 


Less: Imports
−1,544.30
 


Net exports of goods and services
 
−498.10


Federal
752.20
 


State and local
1,323.30
 


Government consumption expenditures and gross investment
 
2,075.50


Gross domestic product (GDP) [note 5]
 
11,004.10


The production side report also begins with individuals and families, in this case their personal consumption expenditures on goods and services, C in the definition. Durable goods are expected to last more than a year (furniture, appliances, cars, etc.) and to have little or no secondary resale market. Nondurable goods are used up within a year (food, clothing, medicine...). Services includes everything else, everything we buy that has little or no physical presence, like banking, health care, insurance, movie tickets, and so on.
Gross private domestic investment includes expenditures on goods that are expected to be used for an extended period of time, I in the definition. Residential investment includes owner occupied and rental housing. Nonresidential investment includes buildings, machinery, and equipment used for commercial or industrial purposes (small business, agriculture, manufacturing, service, etc.). The last element of Investment accounts for any change in the value of previous investments that are still in use, called inventory.
Net Exports reports the balance between goods produced domestically but consumed abroad (X) and goods produced abroad but consumed domestically (M). There is no distinction between consumption and investment or between the private and public sectors; a consumer's imported television, a corporation's imported lab equipment, and the government's use of imported food on military bases count equally. When net exports are positive, the country has a trade surplus. When Net Exports are negative, there is a trade deficit.
Government Consumption Expenditures and Gross Investment includes all government expenditures on domestically produced goods and services. Like an individual or family, the government consumes food, clothing, furniture, and other goods and services in its administrative, military, correctional, and other programs. Governments also invest in buildings for program use and in improvements to harbors, rivers, roads, and airports. Transfer payments, like subsidies to the unemployed or the retired, are not included in this item, since they are simply a movement of money from government to citizens, rather than a purchase of goods or services.
The sum of the four production categories is gross domestic product, the value of all domestic expenditures on goods and services. GDP (income) must equal GDP (production) except for any rounding error that accumulates when the data used to prepare a table includes rounding at prior stages of analysis, as appears to have happened in this case.
See also[edit]

Aggregation problem
Macroeconomics
National accounts
United Nations System of National Accounts
Measures of national income and output
Classification of Individual Consumption by Purpose

Notes[edit]



^ a b On 17 Sep 2004 the U.S. Bureau of Economic Analysis National Income and Product Accounting (US BEA NIPA) web site was http://www.bea.doc.gov/bea/dn1.htm. At that time, the tables cited here were downloaded as a wk1 format spreadsheet in a zip file through a button on that page.

The BEA's table and line numbers were removed for clarity and the sums were recalculated. Copies of the downloaded BEA NIPA tables used to construct the example, including table and line numbers, are in a pdf file.
The BEA offers the NIPA tables interactively and as txt, zipped wk1, exe, csv, and pdf files. Footnotes to the BEA's tables are available in their pdf file only. The downloads include the two most recent annual values and the five most recent quarterly values for each item. The quarterly values are seasonally adjusted at annual rates; they do not add to a reported annual value.
The income side of the report is derived from BEA NIPA Tables 1.7.5 (Relation of gross domestic product, gross national product, net national product, national income, and personal income) and 1.12 (National income by type of income).
The production side of the report is derived from BEA NIPA Table 1.1.5 (Gross domestic product). There is a 0.1 (US$100M or 0.00091%) rounding error from the official GDP (11,004.0) in the recalculated sum on the Product Accounts side.


^ Employee compensation includes wages and salaries plus employer payments for government insurance and pension programs.
^ IVA refers to inventory valuation adjustment and CCA refers to capital consumption adjustment; they are features of U.S. tax law.
^ Corporate profits reported here are before taxes. They are divided among Tax payments (234.90), net dividends (395.30), and Undistributed profits (also known as retained earnings) (390.90).
^ a b GDP includes all goods and services produced within a country.



References[edit]

J. Steven Landefeld, Eugene P. Seskin, and Barbara M. Fraumeni. 2008. "Taking the Pulse of the Economy: Measuring GDP". Journal of Economic Perspectives, 22(2), pp. 193–216. PDF link (press +).
Ott, Mack (2008). "National Income Accounts". In David R. Henderson (ed.). Concise Encyclopedia of Economics (2nd ed.). Indianapolis: Library of Economics and Liberty. ISBN 978-0865976658. OCLC 237794267. CS1 maint: Extra text: editors list (link)

External links[edit]

The Nigerian Bureau of Economic Analysis,'A Guide to the National Income and Product Accounts of N Very helpful in understanding the accounts; also contains historical information and is an important source of information for this article.
United States, Bureau of Economic Analysis, 2008, Concepts and Methods of the National Product Accounts of the United States, More detailed than the Guide, above .
Google – public data: GDP and Personal Income of the U.S. (annual): Taxes on Production and Imports
Google – public data: GDP and Personal Income of the U.S. (annual): Taxes on Production and Imports less Subsidies
National income and product accounts publications available on FRASER





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=National_Income_and_Product_Accounts&oldid=756452196"					
Categories: National accountsWelfare economicsEconomy of the United StatesHidden categories: CS1 maint: Extra text: editors list 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


Italianoతెలుగు 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 December 2016, at 09:10.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Type approval - Wikipedia





















 






Type approval

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For Declaration of Conformity see Conformance mark
Type Approval or Certificate of Conformity is granted to a product that meets a minimum set of regulatory, technical and safety requirements. Generally, type approval is required before a product is allowed to be sold in a particular country, so the requirements for a given product will vary around the world. Processes and certifications known as Type Approval in English are generally called Homologation, or some cognate expression, in other European languages.
Compliance to type-approval requirements can be denoted by a third-party marking on the back of the product (e.g. ABS, TUV,UL, CSA), or by a Type-Approval certificate obtained by a manufacturer and kept on file. The CE mark found on the back of many electronic devices does not mean that the product has obtained Type Approval in the European Union. The CE mark is the manufacturer's declaration that the system/assembly meets the MINIMUM safety requirements of all the Directives (laws) applicable to it, and of itself, does not signify any Third Party involvement in the design or testing of a system/assembly. Many of the New Approach safety directives do not mandate third party involvement at all (e.g. LVD, EMD), and the ones that do (e.g. PED, MDD, ATEX) only require Notified Body (NoBo) involvement above a certain degree of risk category. When the risk category mandates this involvement, the CE Marking on the system/assembly will be followed by the NoBo number, which right to use is granted by the NoBo after the required design review, testing or auditing, as spelled out in the Conformity Assessment options of each Directive. See http://ec.europa.eu/enterprise/policies/single-market-goods/cemarking/about-ce-marking/index_en.htm. On the other hand, in China type approval is denoted by the CCC mark.
Type Approval is not a term confined to a particular industry. Type Approval requirements exist for products as diverse as marine equipment, mobile phones, automotive industry, or medical equipment. Type approval simply means that the product is certified to meet certain requirements for its type, whatever that may be.



Contents


1 In the automotive industry
2 In telecommunications
3 Certificate of Conformity, Conformance or Compliance

3.1 American Commerce
3.2 American nuclear business
3.3 European Commerce

3.3.1 History and legislation




4 See also
5 References
6 External links



In the automotive industry[edit]
Main articles: Motor vehicle type approval and Vehicle category
Vehicle Type Approval is the confirmation that production samples of a design will meet specified performance standards.[1] Traditionally, there are two systems of Type Approval in Europe. The first one bases on the EC Directives and regulates the approval of whole vehicles, vehicle systems, and separate components. The second one is part of the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe regulations (UNECE) and also regulates the approval of whole vehicles, vehicle systems, and separate components. Recent changes to the requirements have seen the General Safety Regulation (GSR) EC661/2009 amending Directive 2007/46/EC by substituting the equivalent UNECE Regulations in place of the EC Directives. In effect the Directives are being replaced by UNECE Regulations. This now makes compliance with the UNECE Regulations for Type Approval submissions compulsory from 1 November 2012 and compulsory for all vehicles entering to service from 1 November 2014.
The new Framework Directive (Directive 2007/46/EC establishing a framework for the approval of motor vehicles and their trailers, and of systems, components and separate technical units intended for such vehicles)[2] rules the approval schemes of the new motor vehicles and their trailers in the European Union:[3]

European Community Whole Vehicle Type Approval (ECWVTA), this currently applies to passenger cars. from the 29th October 2012, ECWVTA was extended to cover all new road vehicles and their trailers.[4]
United Nations Economic Commission for Europe (UNECE) regulations.
National Small Series Type Approval (NSSTA) - the key advantages of this scheme are that some technical requirements may be reduced in comparison with ECWVTA; however, the number of vehicles that can be manufactured are limited.
Individual Vehicle Approval (IVA) (previously Single vehicle approval)

In telecommunications[edit]
Each jurisdiction that regulates communications requires all types of equipment, and especially radio communications equipment, that are not specifically exempted (by reason of low power output, for instance) to be tested for conformance to local regulations before it is approved for use in that jurisdiction. Such conformance might include power and noise characteristics, use of permitted frequencies only, frequency stability, and various other electrical parameters.
Certificate of Conformity, Conformance or Compliance[edit]
American Commerce[edit]
A certificate of conformance is defined in American commerce as a document certified by a competent authority that the supplied good or service meets the required specifications. A certificate of conformance is a lot/datecode specific certification that provides traceability of the goods back to the point of manufacture.
American nuclear business[edit]
A certificate of conformity may be required of vendors of goods to nuclear generating stations to get the vendor to legally commit to stating compliance with applicable laws and regulations.
European Commerce[edit]
A CoC or EC Certificate of Conformity is an equal to a declaration of the conformity with the type approval of EC. It is produce to ensure the free movement of cars within the European Union, specifically for those cars that are subject to homologation or registration.
A CoC is a producer’s declaration car or motorcycles comply with the given approved type. This document contains information about the vehicle and its producer’s identification, type approval number, other technical specifications. The content of a CoC is defined by the European regulation (Amendment IX, Regulation 92/53). Vehicles which do not comply with the EU specification (as vehicle manufactured for the U.S. or Japanese market) and older vehicles that have not been given the type approval of the EC yet, cannot have an existing CoC. Similarly, it is not possible to issue a CoC for converted vehicles; in this case another technical document might help register your car. Only car and motorcycles are eligible.
History and legislation[edit]
Certificates of Conformity have been defined in EU’s Single Internal Market and Type Approval Directive (EC-92). EU’s single internal market became official on 1 January 1993. Part of the “EC-92” effort was to remove the technical barriers preventing the free movement of products within the EU market. The greatest impact of this effort has been in the area of standards in the automotive sector. The EU Commission is seeking to harmonise the automotive, technical and environmental standards between all the member states. EU legislation defines the standards in the areas of noise, particle emissions and safety. In addition, the EU’s directive on Type Approval (EU Council Directive 92/53) eliminates the need for national type approval requirements by establishing one set of rules for automobiles and their components throughout the EU. This directive aims at the clarification of the type approval procedure for motor vehicles, separate technical units (i.e., trailers), and components.
It simplifies the documentation, designates the type approval number of a separate technical unit by a certificate of conformity, and defines the vehicles, individual technical unit(s), and component(s). Certificates of Conformity, as specified in Annex IX of EU Directive 92/53, will be required for an automobile to enter into service. For component approvals, an endorsement that is issued under the relevant regulations by the U.N. Economic Commission for Europe (UNECE) is recognised as equivalent to an approval granted under comparable EU legislation. In March 1992, the EU Council formally adopted the few remaining pieces of component-related legislation that are necessary to make the whole-vehicle type approval a reality for passenger cars. In June 1992, EU member state officials approved the adoption of EU legislation creating a single system for the certification of passenger cars, in turn defining the safety, and other technical, requirements. Legislation established an EU type approval system to replace the national schemes of the twelve member states. In 1996, the EU type approval system became mandatory.
Vehicles with an EU type approval can be marketed anywhere in the European Community. Therefore, a vehicle only needs to receive the type approval certification in one EU country in order to be accepted in all of the other member countries. To receive a type approval, products may either be brought to a testing facility or manufacturers may opt to maintain their own testing equipment. Nevertheless, US and EU automobiles still must be certified to this single set of rules by an authorised member state agency. A similar system was adopted for the type approval of two- and three-wheeled vehicles, which became effective on 1 January 1994.
See also[edit]

American Bureau of Shipping
Aftermarket kit
EuroNCAP
Lloyd's Register
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration
Type certificate - for aircraft
Vehicle registration

References[edit]



^ VCA Offices Retrieved 08/29/2012
^ "Directive 2007/46/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 5 September 2007 establishing a framework for the approval of motor vehicles and their trailers, and of systems, components and separate technical units intended for such vehicles (Framework Directive) Text with EEA relevance". EUR-Lex.europa.eu - Access to European Union law. publications.europa.eu - Publications Office of the European Union. 09/10/2007. Retrieved 27 September 2009.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ "Motor Vehicle Approval Schemes". Ireland: National Standards Authority of Ireland. NSAI.ie. 1 April 2009. Archived from the original on June 17, 2009. Retrieved 27 September 2009. 
^ "EC Whole Vehicle Type Approval - Introduction". UK Vehicle Certification Agency, Department for Transport. VCA.gov.uk. 24 September 2009. Retrieved 27 September 2009. 



External links[edit]

Type Approval Specialist


Certificate of Conformity supplier
International Regulatory Approval Consultants.
NTS International Approvals service
International Type Approval services
Worldwide Type Approval Services for 315 MHz; 433 MHz; 2,4 GHz; 24 GHz; 77 GHz; GSM; UMTS; LTE; Wi-Fi devices; Bluetooth devices; Zigbee devices; WiMAX devices; RFID
China SRRC Type Approval Services
German Type Approval Services supplier
Country Type Approval Services
Regulatory updates
Compliance Advisor Global Type Approval services for Wireless and Telecommunications devices.





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Type_approval&oldid=781157891"					
Categories: Product certificationHidden categories: CS1 errors: dates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


DeutschFrançaisItalianoNederlands日本語Norsk nynorskРусскийУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 19 May 2017, at 13:03.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 













Standard Certification Marks · Technick.net



























​Home
​Guides
​Tools
​About





​ ​
guides ​ electronics
Standard Certification Marks
GUIDE: Standard Certification Marks









 It appears that
you are using AdBlocking software. The cost of running this website
is covered by advertisements. If you like it please feel free to
 a small amount of
money to secure the future of this website.






 It appears that
you are using AdBlocking software. The cost of running this website
is covered by advertisements. If you like it please feel free to
 a small amount of
money to secure the future of this website.










​ 01 Mar 1998 - Nicola Asuni


[VDE Testing and
Certification Institute] [Underwriters Laboratories Inc.] [CSA International] [NEMKO] [DEMKO] [FIMKO] [SEMKO] [VARIOUS]



VDE Testing and Certification
Institute


Mark
Description



VDE Mark for appliances as technical equipment according to
the Appliance Safety Law (GSG), for Medical Device Law (MPG),
components and installation materials.The VDE Mark indicates
conformity with the VDE standards or European or internationally
harmonized standards resp. and confirms compliance with protective
requirements of the applicable EC Directive(s). The VDE Mark is a
symbol for electrical, mechanical, thermal, toxic, radiological and
other hazards.



For appliances as technical equipment according to the
GSG.For ready-to-use equipment, the licence holder may chose to
affix the VDE Mark or the VDE GS Mark.



For products certified on the basis of harmonized
certification agreements.Testing is based on harmonized
European standards listed in the ENEC Agreement. Products (at present luminaires
and related components, energy saving lamps, IT equipment,
transformers, switches for appliances, electrical controls, certain
types of capacitors and EMI suppression components) tested to
tested to the listed standards may be marked with the ENEC Mark of
the VDE. The approval of any other body participating in the ENEC
Agreement is not required.



For appliances in compliance with standards for
electromagnetic compatibility.The VDE EMC Mark expresses the
conformity of a product with applicable standards for
electromagnetic compatibility. The reliable function of the product
in its electromagnetic environment is also included. The
requirements for granting this mark comprise automatically and
without restriction the compliance with applicable standards.



For cables, insulated cords, installation conduits and
ducts, the VDE Cable Mark is applicable.


For cables and cords, the VDE Identification Thread may be
used.



VDE-HARmonization Marking


The VDE HARmonization Marking or VDE HARmonization Thread resp.
for cables and insulated cords according to harmonized
certification procedures.Testing is based on the Harmonization
Documents (HD) listed in the HAR Agreement. Products (harmonized
power cables) tested and found in compliance with with the
requirements of the mentioned standards may be marked with the VDE
HARmonization Marking. Further information is available from the
Laboratory for Cables and Cords, Materials and Special Tests.



The VDE Component Mark may be used for electronic
components.



The CECC Mark for electronic components according to CECC
Specifications.For electronic components according to CECC
Specifications (CECC: CENELEC Electronic Components Committee) the
CECC Mark may be used.



VDE-Reg.-Nr. XXXXX
VDE-Reg.-Nr. (VDE Certificate of Conformity in conjunction with
factory surveillance)This mark is used in two cases: firstly,
for products in compliance with applicable clauses of VDE standards
in the absence of a fully applicable VDE standard, and secondly, if
a product, e.g. a sub-assembly, requires the fulfillment of
additional conditions when incorporated into complete equipment.
For cables and insulated cords, the VDE-Reg.-Nr. or the relevant
mark resp. is applicable in absence of special regulations for
products which were tested on the basis other standards. Special
constructions and all variations of non-harmonized cables and
insulated cords belong to this category of products.





Underwriters Laboratories
Inc.


Mark
Description



UL Listing Mark
This is one of the most common UL Marks. If a product carries this
Mark, it means UL found that samples of this product met UL's
safety requirements. These requirements are primarily based on UL's
own published Standards for Safety. This type of Mark is seen
commonly on appliances and computer equipment, furnaces and
heaters, fuses, electrical panelboards, smoke and carbon monoxide
detectors, fire extinguishers and sprinkler systems, personal
flotation devices like life jackets and life preservers, bullet
resistant glass, and thousands of other products.



C-UL Listing Mark
This mark is applied to products for the Canadian market. The
products with this type of mark have been evaluated to Canadian
safety requirements, which may be somewhat different from U.S.
safety requirements. You will see this type of Mark on appliances
and computer equipment, vending machines, household burglar alarm
systems, lighting fixtures, and many other types of products.



C-UL US Listing Mark
UL introduced this new Listing Mark in early 1998. It indicates
compliance with both Canadian and U.S. requirements. The
Canada/U.S. UL Mark is optional. UL encourages those manufacturers
with products certified for both countries to use this new,
combined Mark, but they may continue using separate UL Marks for
the United States and Canada.



Classification Mark
This mark appears on products which UL has also evaluated. Products
carrying this mark have been evaluated for specific properties, a
limited range of hazards, or suitability for use under limited or
special conditions. Typically, products Classified by UL fall into
the general categories of building materials and industrial
equipment. Examples of types of equipment Classified by UL include
immersion suits, fire doors, protective gear for fire fighters and
industrial trucks.



C-UL Classification Mark
This Classification marking is used for products intended for the
Canadian marketplace. It indicates that UL has used Canadian
standards to evaluate the product for specific hazards or
properties. Examples of C-UL Classified products include air filter
units, firestop devices, certain types of roofing systems, and
others.



C-UL US Classification Mark
UL introduced this new Classification Mark in early 1998. It
indicates compliance with both Canadian and U.S. requirements. The
Canada/U.S. UL Mark is optional. UL encourages those manufacturers
with products certified for both countries to use this new,
combined Mark, but they may continue using separate UL Marks for
the United States and Canada.



Recognized Component Mark and Canadian Recognized Component
Mark
These are marks consumers rarely see because they are specifically
used on component parts that are part of a larger product or
system. These components may have restrictions on their performance
or may be incomplete in construction. The Component Recognition
marking is found on a wide range of products, including some
switches, power supplies, printed wiring boards, some kinds of
industrial control equipment and thousands of other products.
Products intended for Canada carry the Recognized Component mark
"C."



Recognized Component Mark for Canada and the United
States
This new UL Recognized Component Mark,which became effective April
1, 1998, may be used on components certified by UL to both Canadian
and U.S. requirements. Although UL had not originally planned to
introduce a combined Recognized Component Mark, the popularity of
the Canada/U.S. Listing and Classification Marks among clients with
UL certifications for both Canada and the United States has led to
the new Mark.



International "emc-Mark"
The International "emc-Mark" appears on products meeting the
electromagnetic compatibility requirements of Europe, the United
States, Japan, Australia, or any combination of the four. In the
United States, some types of products can't be sold without proof
of compliance to U.S. electromagnetic compatibility requirements.
The types of products that are subject to EMC testing include
medical and dental equipment, computers, microwave ovens,
televisions, radios, transmitters, and radio-controlled
equipment.



EPH Product Mark
The UL EPH mark appear on products that have been evaluated to
Environmental and Public Health Standards. The "Classified" version
is used for products complying with ANSI/NSF Standards and other
food equipment hygiene codes and requirements. Examples include
Food Service and Meat and Poultry Plant Equipment and Drinking
Water Additives. The "Listed" version is typically used for
products complying with UL's own published EPH Standards for
Safety.



Food Service Product Certification Mark
The UL Food Service Product Certification Mark is UL's
Classification Mark with specific reference to the appropriate NSF
International standard. In addition, at the manufacturer's option,
a supplemental Mark can be applied as shown. Equipment bearing the
Mark is not limited to electrical products, but also includes gas
appliances and non-powered equipment. These products are commonly
found in commercial food establishments, institutional food
services and other locations.



Field Evaluated Product Mark
A Field Evaluated Product Mark is applied to a product that is
thoroughly evaluated in the field instead of UL's laboratories or
the manufacturer's facility. If a product has been significantly
modified since its manufacture or the product doesn't bear any
third-party certification mark, a building owner, a regulatory
authority, or anyone else directly involved with the product can
request that UL conduct tests in the field on the specific piece of
equipment. Products that meet appropriate safety requirements are
labeled with a tamper-resistant Field Evaluated Product Mark.



Facility Registration Mark
The UL Registered Firm Mark is a mark you will never see on a
product. Instead, it indicates that a particular facility has
passed UL's evaluation to quality assurance standards and is used
in promotion and marketing by companies with quality assessment
programs audited by UL. The standards UL uses are the ISO 9000
series of quality assurance standards; QS-9000, the quality
standards developed by the Big Three U.S. automakers for their
suppliers; and ISO 14001, the standard covering environmental
management systems.



Marine Mark
The UL Marine mark appears on products which have been evaluated
specifically for marine use. Products bearing this Mark have been
evaluated to UL's published Marine Safety Standards and other
applicable standards and codes. These requirements address hazards
that can occur as a result of exposure to harsh marine environments
such as vibration, shock (impact), ignition protection, water
ingress and salt spray corrosion common on pleasure craft and
boats. Examples of the type of equipment suitable for the UL Marine
Mark include alternators, battery chargers/power inverters,
navigation lights, and fuel tanks, filters and pumps.



AR-UL Mark Used in conjunction with the mandatory "S" Mark of
Argentina's National Office of Internal Commerce (Direccion
Nacional de Comercio Interior, or DNCI), the "AR-UL" Mark indicates
a product's compliance with Phase III of Argentina's Resolution
92/98. Most electrical and electronic products entering Argentina
will have to display the "S" Mark adjacent to the Mark of an
accredited and Recognized third-party certification organization
such as UL de Argentina, S.R.L..









CSA International


Mark
Description



The CSA mark may appear alone or with indicators. If it appears
alone, it means that the product is certified for the Canadian
market, to the applicable Canadian standards.



If the CSA mark appears with the indicator "US" or "NRTL" it
means that the product is certified for the U.S. market, to the
applicable U.S. standards.



If this Mark appears with the indicator "C and US" or "NRTL/C"
it means that the product is certified for both the U.S. and
Canadian markets, to the applicable U.S. and Canadian
standards.



CGA "Script"
The Canadian Gas Association (CGA) "Script" for components of gas
appliances and other liquid petroleum products indicates
certification to applicable Canadian standards.



A.G.A. Blue Star
The American Gas Association (A.G.A.) "Blue Star" mark for gas
appliances and other liquid petroleum products indicates
certification to applicable U.S. standards.



CSA Blue Star
The CSA Blue Star Mark for gas appliances and other liquid
petroleum products indicates certification to applicable U.S.
standards.



CGA Blue Flame
The Canadian Gas Association (CGA) "Blue Flame" mark for gas
appliances and other liquid petroleum products indicates
certification to applicable Canadian standards.



CSA Blue Flame
The CSA Blue Flame Mark for gas appliances and other liquid
petroleum products indicates certification to applicable Canadian
standards.



A.G.A. "Script"
The American Gas Association (A.G.A.) "Script" for components of
gas appliances and other liquid petroleum products indicates
certification to applicable U.S. standards.





NEMKO


Mark
Description



Shows that the product is Safety Certified and when relevant,
that the product is also compliant with the EMC Directive.

The well-known N-mark is a certification mark based on Nemko's own
testing or results from testing performed by often labratory
according to multi-national or bi-lateral agreement or by otherwise
Nemko accepted labratories including all authorized manufacturers.
The mark itself signifies that Nemko has tested or certified the
product according to national standards official safety regulations
in Norway. (which in principle are aquivalent to those of the other
European EU/EEA states)



Shows that the product is tested and certified as above, but
signifies clearly that the product is certified for both safety and
EMC by Nemko or by a Nemko authorized labratory. In addition this
mark confirms that the product also covers the EMC Directive,
tested by Nemko or Nemko authorized laboratories.



The product is only certified for EMC by Nemko.



Products certified by Nemko may if desired be tagged with the
unique "Nemko Approved" label for use as advertising, shows,
displays packages and also on the actual products.





DEMKO


Mark
Description



DEMKO's D-Mark represents electrical product safety for a great
majority of consumers.
The D-Mark demonstrates that, from a safety point of view, the
tested product complies with:

Harmonised standards, e.g. EN/HD
International standards, e.g. IEC
National standards, e.g. DS
Other national standards e.g. American National or UL
Standards
Other relevant parts of the above-mentioned standards which
form part of the basis for certification e.g. National
Deviations.





DEMKO is the Competent Body for the EMC Directive and performs
testing under the EMC Directive. An EMC test, in addition to an LVD
test, at DEMKO gives you the right to use DEMKO's EMC Mark. The
accompanying report can be used as documentation for CE Marking of
your product in accordance with the EMC Directive. Safety related
EMC tests under the Low Voltage and Machinery Directives should
always be performed either before, or in connection with, EMC
testing under the EMC Directive in order to avoid expensive double
work. EMC testing at DEMKO can be monitored by the manufacturer so
that any problems arising can be dealt with immediately, or DEMKO
can, by agreement with the manufacturer, make any necessary changes
and retest the product.



European EMC Mark
A mark for EMC has been introduced in the 15 most recognised
certification bodies in Europe.

The CCA EMC Mark gives you the possibility to document that EMC
requirements, which can often be difficult to handle, have been
complied with.
The CCA EMC Mark is recognised by the certification bodies in
the 15 countries who recognise each other's results. Full European
recognition is hereby achieved.
The EMC Certificate is always documented by an accompanying EMC
test report.
The EMC Mark can be used together with national safety marks as
well as with the CE Mark.







FIMKO


Mark
Description



The SGS Fimko FI mark is a well-known and respected impartial
certification mark indicating the safety and quality of a product.
The FI mark can only be used on products that have a valid FI
certificate granted by FIMKO.
The FI mark can appear on the certified product, in the User’s
Manual and Installation Guide, in product catalogues and, for
example in newspaper, TV and radio advertisements. Below the FI
mark our slogan ‘safe quality’ can be used to strengthen and
enchance the value of the mark (see figure). More information about
the use of the FI mark can be found in FIMKO’s FI handbook and on a
diskette which can be obtained free of charge.



An EMC certificate issued by FIMKO is a powerful way of
demonstrating the EMC conformity of the product for international
markets. SGS Fimko’s EMC mark gives added value and can be used in
marketing, for example on the packaging, in brochures and price
lists. EMC certified products can be browsed on SGS Fimko’s website
under the FI register, product lists. The EMC certificate granted
by SGS Fimko requires that testing is carried out according to
European standards or in a testing laboratory assessed and approved
by SGS Fimko.
SGS Fimko’s EMC mark can be granted to all products which are in
accordance with European standards, for example household
appliances, switches for household appliances, lighting fittings,
measurement instruments, electromedical equipment, IT equipment,
office machines, hand-held tools and consumer electronics.





SEMKO


Mark
Description



The S marking, which is volontary today, means that SEMKO as an
impartial testing laboratory certifies that the product fulfils
valid safety requirements.
The safety requirements include checking of e.g.

electrical safety
fire protection
mechanical hazards
radiation risks, e.g. of CD players and solaria







VARIOUS


Mark
Description



The CE-marking is the manufacturer's statement to the EU
authorities that his product complies with all relevant CE-marking
Directives. It is important to emphasise that the CE-marking is not
a quality mark or a guarantee to consumers in EU.
The manufacturer is always responsible - within or outside EU - for
CE-marking. If the manufacturer is not located in EU, he can
authorise a representative located in EU who thus becomes
responsible for CE-marking. The representative's duties and
responsibilities must be agreed in writing. Importers not
authorised by the manufacturer must keep his documentation in
safekeeping in EU for ten years after the last production date.
Please bear in mind, that the importer may always be held
responsible for the documentation.



ENEC is an abbreviation for "European Norms Electrical
Certification". These four letters are part of the registered trade
mark that demonstrates that a product has been certified by one of
the national certification institutes in Europe. Today, there are
18 certification institutes who are signatories to the agreement.
Apart from the ENEC Mark itself, there is also a two digit number
that indicates which certification body has issued the ENEC
Certificate.
The ENEC Agreement was originally (in 1991 under the name, the LUM
Agreement) started with a view to providing manufacturers of
luminaires with a joint European certification mark to replace all
the different national marks. In 1999, the agreement was expanded
to include:

Lighting
Components for lampholders
IT
Electric office equipment
Safety isolating transformers
Isolating transformers and separating transformers
Power supply units
Switches





The GS-Mark is the German national mark that demonstrates that
a product has been tested and found to comply with the standards
for the product. The GS-Mark is to Germans what the Danish D-Mark
is to Danes. The GS-Mark is very well recognised by German
consumers; so well recognised that certain products are nearly
impossible to sell without the GS-Mark.

For manufacturers and importers wishing to sell their electrical
products in Germany, it is a good idea to have a GS-Mark. There are
three particular areas where a GS-Mark is nearly a necessity:
tools, IT equipment and electromedical equipment.
Manufacturers of tools often have a hard, if not impossible, time
selling their products in Germany without a GS-Mark because such
marking is supported by consumers and the trade unions. IT
equipment is also effected by the requirement for GS-Marking; the
mark is a requirement if you wish to sell major companies or
institutions.
The third area where the GS-Mark is particularly important is
electromedicine because a GS-Mark is a prerequisite for a grant to
the institution in question from the German authorities.



Keymark is a European safety mark identical to the well-known
systems on which the existing European CCA system is built. Some of
the most important criteria for testing products under the CCA
rules are: factory inspection, random sample supervision and
testing performed by testing institutes of equal standing. Market
supervision is performed, i.e. products are periodically sampled
from the market for examination in accordance with the procedures
applied by the individual countries' national bodies. The testing
institute responsible for issuing the Keymark is identified by
means of a numerical code which constitutes part of the Keymark
itself.



Institute für
Software, Elektronik, Bhantechnik



The NOM Mark is the Mexican product safety mark. Our Mexico
City laboratory is an accredited SECOFI laboratory - however, you
can receive testing from any one of our laboratories to receive
this certification.



Warnock Mark Mark represents compliance to United States and/or
Canadian product safety standards. The Warnock Hersey Mark can be
found mainly on fire doors, sealed insulated glass, building
materials and gas and oil fired products, like hearth
products.



The GOST R certification mark is part of the mandatory Russian
Certification system.



ETL Listed Mark
ETL Listed Mark represents compliance to United States and/or
Canadian product safety standards. You will find the ETL Listed
Mark on electrical- gas-, or oil- fired products.

For the United States, we are recognized by Occupational Safety
Hazards Association (OSHA) as an National
Recognized Testing Laboratory (NRTL). Click on the NRTL
link to view the scope of recognition (the list of standards,
sites, and programs that OSHA has recognized us for). In Canada, we
are accredited by the Standards Council of Canada (SCC) as a
Testing Organization and a Certification Organization.



ENERGY STAR is the symbol for energy efficiency. It's a label
-- created by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency and the U.S.
Department of Energy -- to help consumers save money and prevent
air pollution.

An appliance or product with the ENERGY STAR label means that it's
in the top of its class for energy efficiency. Products that meet
EPA and Department of Energy efficiency criteria qualify as ENERGY
STAR. Consumers save money with ENERGY STAR products because they
use less energy than conventional products and cost less to
operate. ENERGY STAR products also offer the same or often better
performance and features as conventional products.





​



 




​









© 1998-2017 –
Nicola Asuni - Tecnick.com - All rights
reserved.
about - disclaimer -
privacy














CCA International SA | Company Spotlight Profile











Warning! This site has features that require JavaScript.












watch








        CCA International SA
        
      

Sector: 


            Business Services Not Elsewhere Classified
          
Region: 

France


 
  : 

|
Euronext Paris: CCA


  



Listed in: 
Consumer Goods and Services


        Similar to:
Hyrican Informationssysteme AG, 
        Systar SA





♣ Request Investor Kit

 View Contact Details







 News & Analysis
















 Featured Company


Value and Income Trust PLC
Glasgow, GB
Value & Income Trust PLC is an investment trust, which is designed for both institutional and private investors, whose shares...







 You may also be interested in:





Systar SA



Saint-Cloud, IF, FR
Systar SA engages in the development and marketing of business activity monitoring for large businesses, administrations, and banks. Its product...




Hyrican Informationssysteme AG



Kindelbrück, TH, DE
Hyrican Informationssysteme AG engages in the provision of information and communications technology services. Its activities include the distribution and sale...




BlackRock MuniYield New Jersey Quality Fund, Inc.



Wilmington, DE, US











×
Contact Investor Relations



CCA International SA
Investor Relations
         77, avenue de Ségur
         Paris , IF 75015
         France
Phone:33.1.53.05.75.75

SIC Code:
7389



Close




×
Request Investor Kit









Select your country:


Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire, St. Eust., Saba
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
Brit. Indian Ocean Terr.
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo (Dem. Rep. of the)
Congo (Rep. of)
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Terr.
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard & McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
La Reunion
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marianas
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthelemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre & Miquelon
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Marten
Slovakia
Slovenia
So Georgia & So Sand Isl
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Vincent & Grenadines
St. Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Minor Outlying Isl.
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis & Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe





E-mail:


required field!



First Name:


required field!



Last Name:


required field!




Street 1:


required field!



Street 2:





City:


required field!



State/Province:


-
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming


required field!



Postal Code:


required field!






 I consent to receiving periodic email communications from CCA International SA. 
            

 I'd like to receive more information from PrecisionIR.
            







Watch

Watch this company to be notified of upcoming earnings calls and new content with a weekly digest sent to your email.
            
 Watch content
            




Go!
Cancel






Company Spotlight is available free to investors through the financial support of participating companies. In return for receiving this free information, your contact data are made available to the companies whose reports you have ordered, and to other parties as described in our privacy policy, which you can read in its entirety here. In addition, you agree to be contacted by these companies from time to time. You may select at any time to opt out of these communications by using the unsubscribe link in your email(s) or by sending an email to nacustomerservice@precisionir.com.



×
 Enter your email address to watch this company.




E-mail (required):


required field!



First Name:





Last Name:












    Signup 




×
  Enter your email address and notification preferences.




A reminder has been added for this event.



    Add to Calendar
  


Add to Google Calendar


Add to Live Calendar


Add to Yahoo! Calendar


Add to iCalender


Add to Outlook Calendar







Or





Send me a reminder




Weeks

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52



Days

0
1
2
3
4
5
6



Hours

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23



Minutes

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52
53
54
55
56
57
58
59





before the event.

Please enter a valid email to watch!

First Name

Last Name








    Signup 












Contact Us





























Skip to content
















My CCA


Contact























Our Company


Our Vision and Values


Our Strategy


Our Board of Directors


Our Group Leadership Team


Our History


Corporate Governance




Our Businesses & Brands


Our Businesses


Our Brands




Our Contribution


Wellbeing


Community


Foundations


Environment


Reporting




Doing Businesswith us


Expectations of Suppliers


Transacting with us


Responsible Sourcing


Partner for Growth Awards




Investors & Media


Annual Reports


ASX Announcements


Media Releases


Financial Results


Presentations


Debt Investors


Annual General Meeting


Key Dates


2017 Share Buyback


Shareholder Information


Media & Investors Contacts




Our People &  Careers


Health & Safety


Diversity & Inclusion


Your Career









My CCA


Contact
























Contact us












Australia


View Contact Details






New Zealand


View Contact Details






Indonesia


View Contact Details






Papua New Guinea


View Contact Details






Fiji


View Contact Details






Samoa


View Contact Details













Coca-Cola Amatil Corporate






Head Office
Level 14, 40 Mount Street
North Sydney, NSW 2060
Tel: +61 2 9259 6222










Australia






Australian Sales and Customer Service Centre
Sales and Service Enquiries:
13 COKE (13 26 53)
Consumer Information Centre 
(Toll Free within Australia): 1800 025 123
From Overseas: (+61 2) 9436 8818
Online Sales & Service: www.mycca.com.au
Email: consumer_information@ccamatil.com








New Zealand






Coca-Cola Amatil (NZ) Ltd
Tel:  0800 262 226
Tel:  (+64 0) 9570 3000
Fax:  (+64 0) 9570 3039
Email: nzl.coke@ccamatil.com


NZ Consumer, Students or
Promotional Enquiries
Consumer Information Centre
Toll Free Number within NZ:
0800 505 123


NZ Sales and Customer
Service Centre
Toll Free Number within NZ:
0800 262 226
Phone: +64 9570 3000






Indonesia






Consumer and Customer Enquiries
Tel: +62 21 8832 2222
[Call: +62 21 8832 2222] #9000
Fax: +62 21 8832 0014








Fiji






Consumer and Customer Enquiries
(+61 2) 9436 8818








Papua New Guinea






Consumer and Customer Enquiries
+675 472 1033








Samoa






Consumer and Customer Enquiries

(+61 2) 9436 8818








American Depositary Receipts (ADR)






BNY Mellon Shareowner Services
PO Box 358016
Pittsburgh, PA 15252-8016
Toll Free (domestic): 1 888 BNY ADRS
International: 1 201 680 6825
Email: shareowners@bankofny.com
www.adrbnymellon.com



































	Electronics Engineering to Manufacturing Logistics | Celestica




















Toll-free in North America:+1 888-899-9998International Telephone:+1 416-448-5800 




















Share this page


Tweet



































                                    Managing Complexity in a Dynamic World
                                


The world is transforming. We are anticipating the future and enabling our customers’ success. 














                    Celestica Announces Q2 2017 Financial Results
                

                    Click here for more information. 
                













                    Celestica Named to Corporate Knight’s Best 50 Corporate Citizen List
                

                    Click here to learn more.  
                













                    The Evolving Nature of Corporate Innovation
                

                    Hari Hariharan discusses the importance of innovation as corporate lifeblood.
                













                    “Innovation no longer happens within a company’s four walls”
                

                    Learn how a cross-industry collaboration brought a game-changing IoT solution.
                













                    Transforming Through Joint Design and Manufacturing
                

                    Learn how others have leveraged JDM to accelerate their success.
                













                    Market Focus: Enterprise and Cloud Solutions
                

                    Customized solutions provide new and faster ways to develop products.
                






















 CCA International SA - Company Details on Zawya MENA Edition

















































×
Sector Definitions










Transport






Transportation Products






Automotive






Auto Parts and Accessories






Manufacturing


















							Companies that manufacture and distribute original equipment manufacturer (OEM) and aftermarket automotive components and accessories (including engines, carburetors, pistons, valves, electrical and electronic equipment, tires, lighting, steering, and seating equipment, air-conditioning systems, filters, and other components and accessories).
						

							Companies that design, manufacture, assemble, and distribute automobiles (including passenger cars, small engine vehicles, buses, trucks, motorcycles, recreational vehicles, armored vehicles, military vehicles, and vehicle parts) in addition to companies that provide repair, maintenance, and other support services.
						

							Companies that provide transportation services (including air, ground, and maritime transportation in addition to logistics services) and design, manufacture, assemble, and distribute transportation products (including aircrafts, automobiles, boats, and rail products).
						

							Companies that design, manufacture, assemble, and trade in equipment for transporting people and goods (including road automotive equipment, trains, ships, boats, aircrafts, recreational vehicles, and equipment parts).  The industry also includes companies that provide repair, maintenance, and other services related to transportation equipment.
						

							Companies that manufacture original equipment manufacturer (OEM) and aftermarket automotive components and accessories (including engines, carburetors, pistons, valves, electrical and electronic equipment, tires, lighting, steering, seating, and other equipment, air-conditioning systems, filters, and other automotive components and accessories).
						

















                       THOMSON REUTERS PRODUCTS 



 Solutions for Corporations 


Eikon


FX Trading


World-Check One


Enhanced Due Diligence


Compliance Learning


Org ID


ONESOURCE Indirect Tax


ONESOURCE Transfer Pricing


ONESOURCE Global Trade Management


Legal Managed Services


MatterSphere


Thomson Reuters Projects


Islamic Economy




 Solutions for Emerging Business 


Thomson Reuters Projects


Accelerate SME


Islamic Economy


Business Development MENA




 Solutions for Financial Institutions 


Eikon


Thomson Reuters Elektron


Thomson Reuters FX Trading


World-Check One


Enhanced Due Diligence


Compliance Learning


Org ID


ONESOURCE WorkFlow Manager


Legal Managed Services


Westlaw Middle East


Thomson Reuters Practical Law


Islamic Economy


Thomson Reuters Accelerate SME




 Solutions for Governments 


Eikon


Elektron


Eikon Auctions


Revenue Management


World-Check One


Regulatory Intelligence


Audit Manager


Compliance Learning


Enhanced Due Diligence


ONESOURCE Indirect Tax


Thomson Reuters Aumentum


Westlaw Middle East


Thomson Reuters MatterSphere


Thomson Reuters ProView


C-Track


Practical Law


Thomson Reuters Projects


Islamic Economy


Thomson Reuters Accelerate SME




 Solutions for Professionals 


Eikon


World-Check One


Compliance Learning


Enhanced Due Diligence


ONESOURCE WorkFlow Manager


ONESOURCE Indirect Tax


ONESOURCE Transfer Pricing


Legal Managed Services


Westlaw Middle East





LOGIN
REGISTER
You are on:


 MENA - ENGLISH 


MENA - ENGLISH
UAE - ENGLISH
KSA - ENGLISH
الشرْقُ الأوسَط
السعودية
الإمارات












Search









 


Dubai


                            
                            
                            03 Aug 2017
                        
















Advertisement







last updated on: 17 December 2013
CCA International SA 



                            
                            
                            last trade:
                                4.99 EUR (23 May 2017) 
 0.17



Share profile














Advertisement






                                        Company Details
People
Related News
Similar Companies




fast facts

Country of Incorporation
France


Ownership Type
Publicly Listed


Primary Sector
Transport


Number of Employees
null


Stock Listing



ID
Stock Type
Currency
Exchange
Symbol


KLCA.PA
Ordinary
EUR
Euronext Paris
KLCA







                Stock Performance
                Powered by Thomson Reuters Eikon


 




Last Trade
4.99


Net Change
0.17 


Percent Change
3.53%  




Open
4.99


High
4.99


Low
4.99 




Volume
67


Transactions
1


Value Traded
334


Market Cap
EUR 37M










Contact details


Primary address

                            
                            
                            77 Avenue de Segur,,
                            
                            
                            75008
                            France
                            Paris



CONTACT

Tel: +33 1-53057575
Fax: +33 1-53057585

www.ccainternational.com






Zawya industry classifications

SECTOR
(Definitions)

INDUSTRY




Transport





                                    Transportation Products
                                





                                                Automotive
                                            





                                                            Auto Parts and Accessories
                                                        





                                                                        Manufacturing (Primary Industry)
                                                                    

















Advertisement



Ask Our Analyst

Have questions regarding this company profile? Get expert analysis and insight from our team of analysts.
Talk to Zawya CM Analyst



Company information provided by © 2017 Thomson Reuters

                                            Thomson Reuters research team update company information from primary sources (company annual reports, press releases, company websites, corporate briefings, official statements/interviews) and reliable secondary sources (stock markets, reliable third party publications).
                                        







		Top Business News
	







energy

Saudi's SWCC hires advisers to build two desalination plants

Reuters News -
							3 hours ago









oil and gas

UAE's ENOC secures $500mln revolving credit facility

Reuters News -
							10 hours ago









real estate

Dubai residents can expect further rental decline in freehold areas  

Gulf News -
							10 hours ago







		Find Companies
	















			GO
		


Or choose a preset list 








				GO
			





Advertisement



most viewed companies














Discover Thomson Reuters



Opinion





Opinion - Blake Goud
How the Paris Agreement offers $8 trillion a year in business opportunities



Despite Trump's withdrawal, business groups have identified significant benefits from the climate change accord.








Opinion - Lukman Otunuga
Potential outcomes for the commodity sector as a result of the OPEC meeting in Russia



All in all, oversupply will continue to dominate price action in the oil markets for the foreseeable future



Read more opinions 




Special Coverage

Saudi Transformation


The economic reforms aim to free the kingdom from oil dependence. 



Deflating: Saudi Arabia sees decrease in price of consumer goods for the sixth month in a row
Saudi crown prince discusses defence ties with Turkish minister
Saudi residents expect financial stability in 2017





Advertisement











































Cca Industries, Inc - Supplier | Colombia | Import Genius
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French










			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 





Cca Industries, Inc

Cca International Nj Inc is an overseas supplier in China that exports products to Sodimac Colombia S A. Transportation Type Terrestre.        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Cca Industries, Inc and millions of other manufacturers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database


 OBYCO S.A.                            

 VENCO INTERNATIONAL, INC                            

 ELIOT GERARDO BENAVIDES GONZALEZ                            

 FLORIDAS NATURAL GROWERS                            

 METALMECANICA OMEGA C.A.                            
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Cca Industries, Inc
Cca International Nj Inc is an overseas supplier in China that exports products to Sodimac Colombia S A. Transportation Type Terrestre.


            Bill of Lading        





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



Cca International Nj Inc
328 THOMAS STREET NEWARK, NJ 07114


Sodimac Colombia S A
CR 68 D 80 70



Acquisition
Destination



China


Colombia



Product Description





                                        DO 1713274 UAP: 959 PEDIDO TRAMITE: C.C.A-INTERNATIONAL-63013 DECLARACION(1-1) IMP: 45736                                    

                                        DO 1713274 UAP: 959 PEDIDO TRAMITE: C.C.A-INTERNATIONAL-63013 DECLARACION(1-1) IMP: 45736                                    





Other Information Available




Gross Weight (KG), FOB (USD), Insurance (USD), Freight (USD), CIF (USD), Brand ID, Operation Type








Arrival Date2017-05-02Transportation TypeTerrestreHS Code6912000000CustomsSanta Fe de BogotaQuantity / Unit1040.00/U 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Cca Industries, Inc Join Now








How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Receive free shipment alerts by email whenever Cca Industries, Inc clears a shipment through customs.                        

Processing, please wait ...







Submit












Contact Cca Industries, Inc










 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 




Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.









Cca Industries, Inc
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 21,508,010 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In






















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields





Schedule Live Demo







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 






Ready for a live demo?
Fill out this form and we'll contact you right away to set up a live demo of Import Genius.


Schedule Live Demo



Processing, please wait ...





Name

Tell us your Full Name


Email

Enter a valid email address


Phone

Enter valid phone number


Preferred Date

Let us know your preferred date


Preferred Time (In Your Country)

01:00 am
01:30 am
02:00 am
02:30 am
03:00 am
03:30 am
04:00 am
04:30 am
05:00 am
05:30 am
06:00 am
06:30 am
07:00 am
07:30 am
08:00 am
08:30 am
09:00 am
09:30 am
10:00 am
10:30 am
11:00 am
11:30 am
12:00 am
12:30 am
01:00 pm
01:30 pm
02:00 pm
02:30 pm
03:00 pm
03:30 pm
04:00 pm
04:30 pm
05:00 pm
05:30 pm
06:00 pm
06:30 pm
07:00 pm
07:30 pm
08:00 pm
08:30 pm
09:00 pm
09:30 pm
10:00 pm
10:30 pm
11:00 pm
11:30 pm
12:00 pm

Let us know your preferred time


Country

Required


Timezone

Required


What data are you interested in?

Let us know what you are most interested to learn



Submit



 















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Rava Group Container Services, Inc.                                



                                    Whitmor Inc.                                



                                    Groove Media Technologies Sas                                



                                    Gelein Select Import Bv (gsi)                                



                                    Ultra Painting S.a.s                                











                     
                                            21,508,010  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.3388
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X















